Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1332
Public policy.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the State of Nebraska to safeguard the health, prosperity, and general welfare of its residents by developing, protecting, and maintaining a leading position in ethanol production and the processing of agricultural products into ethanol, ethanol coproducts, or products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts that improve air quality, strengthen energy security, increase demand for agricultural products, provide consumer choice, and displace products produced from petroleum. The Nebraska Ethanol Board shall be the state agency for such purpose. The Legislature also recognizes the need for a statewide approach to identify and attract agricultural processing opportunities that support the Nebraska ethanol industry, the need to participate in programs of research, education, market development, and promotion of ethanol, ethanol coproducts, or products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts, and the need to provide subject matter expertise related to policy and regulatory affairs for ethanol, ethanol coproducts, or products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts.

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB815, § 5.
July 18, 2026